Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2911
Business transactions of member with limited cooperative association.

A member may lend money to and transact other business with the limited cooperative association and has the same rights and obligations with respect to the loan or other transaction as a person that is not a member subject to the articles of organization or bylaws or a specific contract relating to the transaction.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 11.